New Jersey, session 222, S2294.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Each taxpayer filing a return pursuant to subsection b. of N.J.S.54A:2-1 with a gross income of not more than $35,000 or filing a return pursuant to subsection a. of N.J.S.54A:2-1 with a gross income of not more than $50,000, who provides more than one-half of the support for a relative who was at least 70 years of age prior to the taxable year and who resided in the taxpayer's home for at least six months of the taxable year, shall be entitled to a deduction of $3,000 from the taxpayer's gross income. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning after the date of enactment.